California, session 20252026, AB2789.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3176 of the Family Code is amended to read:3176. (a) Notice of mediation and of any hearing to be held pursuant to this chapter shall be given to the following persons:(1) Where mediation is required to settle a contested issue of custody or visitation, to each party and to each party’s counsel of record.(2) Where a stepparent or grandparent seeks visitation rights, to the stepparent or grandparent seeking visitation rights, to each parent of the child, and to each parent’s counsel of record.(b) Notice of mediation shall be given in writing to all parties by one of the following methods:(1) By court staff when all parties are present for a court hearing.(2) By court staff when a party is present at the courthouse.(3) As part of a notice of hearing or court order filed by the court clerk, provided to a party, and served on the other party.(4) By mail, express mail, overnight delivery, or facsimile transmission.(5) By electronic service on parties who are represented by counsel and by the consent of parties who are self-represented, pursuant to Section 1010.6 of the Code of Civil Procedure and Rule 2.251 of the California Rules of Court.(c) Each court shall develop a notice of mediation pursuant to subdivision (b) that includes both of the following:(1) All communications involving the mediator shall be kept confidential between the mediator and the disputing parties pursuant to Section 3188.(2) Where there has been a history of domestic violence between the parties, including allegations or a finding of domestic violence, or where a protective order, as defined in Section 6218, is in effect, the party alleging domestic violence may request that the appointed mediator meet with the parties separately and at separate times pursuant to Section 3181 Rule 2.251 and Rule 5.215, or successor section, of the California Rules of Court.